Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB707.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 268(b) of the act of March 4, 1971 (P.L.6, No.2), known as the Tax Reform Code of 1971, is amended by adding a paragraph to read:Section 268. Crimes.--* * *(b) Other Crimes. * * *(4) Nothing under this subsection shall prohibit an advertisement which includes the amount of the tax imposed under this article in the advertised price if the advertisement conspicuously states that the advertised price includes the amount of the tax imposed under this article.1234567891011121314151617181920212223 * * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0707PN0744 - 2 - 12